Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 51. Incentive Award Program and Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 39.51.010.
Misuse of confidential information. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 39.51.020, 39.51.030.
[Renumbered as AS 39.90.010 and 39.90.020.]

Secs. 39.51.110 — 39.51.200.
Incentive awards program. [Repealed, § 3 ch 60 SLA 1989.]